ava_nouns_.lexd
PATTERNS

N-VAS-Root [<n>:] (N-VAS-ABS-SG|N-VAS-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-VAS-OBL-SG|N-VAS-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-BIHINCHI-Root [<n>:] ([чи] (N-VAS-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-VAS-OBL-SG (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)) | ((N-BIHINCHI-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-BIHINCHI-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-GIALIMCHI-Root [<n>:] ([чи] (N-VAS-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-VAS-OBL-SG (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)) | ((N-GIALIMCHI-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-GIALIMCHI-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-CHI-Root [<n>:] (N-CHI-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-CHI-ABS-PL | (N-CHI-OBL-SG|N-CHI-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES)) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-GIOLOHANCHI-Root [<n>:] (N-GIOLOHANCHI-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-GIOLOHANCHI-ABS-PL | (N-GIOLOHANCHI-OBL-SG|N-GIOLOHANCHI-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES)) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-PREDSEDATEL-Root [<n>:] (N-UCHITEL-ABS-SG|N-UCHITEL-ABS-PL | (N-UCHITEL-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES)) CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-UCHITEL-OBL-SG (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-PREDSEDATEL-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-PREDSEDATEL-OBL-SG (N-PREDSEDATEL-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-GIADAN-Root [<n>:] (N-GIADAN-ABS-SG|N-GIADAN-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-GIADAN-OBL-SG|N-GIADAN-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-DARAN-Root [<n>:] (N-DARAN-CORE-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-DARAN-ABS-SG|N-DARAN-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-DARAN-OBL-SG|N-DARAN-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-STOL-Root [<n>:] (N-STOL-ERG CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-STOL-ABS-SG|N-STOL-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-STOL-OBL-SG|N-STOL-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-MARHA-Root [<n>:] (N-MARHA-ERG CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-MARHA-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-MARHA-ABS-PL | (N-MARHA-OBL-SG|N-MARHA-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES)) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-GII-Root [<n>:] (N-GII-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-GII-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-GII-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-CHINKILLI-Root [<n>:] (N-CHINKILLI-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-CHINKILLI CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-CHINKILLI-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-KAJ-Root [<n>:] (N-KAJ-ABS-SG CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-KAJ CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-KAJ-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-MUZEJ-Root [<n>:] (N-MUZEJ-ABS-SG|N-MUZEJ-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-MUZEJ-OBL-SG|N-MUZEJ-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-CHAJ-Root [<n>:] (N-CHAJ CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-MUZEJ-ABS-SG|N-MUZEJ-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-MUZEJ-OBL-SG|N-MUZEJ-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-ZAVEDUJUSHCHIJ-Root [<n>:] (N-ZAVEDUJUSHCHIJ-ABS-SG|N-ZAVEDUJUSHCHIJ-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-ZAVEDUJUSHCHIJ-OBL-SG|N-ZAVEDUJUSHCHIJ-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-SOBRANIJE-Root [<n>:] (N-SOBRANIJE-ABS-SG|N-SOBRANIJE-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-SOBRANIJE-OBL-SG|N-SOBRANIJE-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-CHERX-Root [<n>:] (N-CHERX-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-CHERX-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-CHERX-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-ZHO-Root [<n>:] (N-ZHO-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (LEXICON N-ZHO-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-ZHO-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-CAD-Root [<n>:] (N-CAD-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (LEXICON N-CAD-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-CAD-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-JAS-Root [<n>:] (N-JAS-ABS-SG|N-JAS-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-JAS-OBL-SG|N-JAS-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-LADI-Root [<n>:] (N-LADI-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-LADI-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-LADI-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-KIODO-Root [<n>:] ((N-KIODO-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-KIODO-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-KIODO-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)) | ((N-JAS-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-JAS-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?))
N-EMEN-Root (N-EMEN-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-EMEN-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-EMEN-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-EBEL-Root (N-EBEL-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-EBEL-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-EBEL-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-CCIN-Root [<n>:] (N-CCIN-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-CCIN-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-CCIN-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-XANZHU-Root [<n>:] (N-XANZHU-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-XANZHU-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-XANZHU-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-CHIUZHU-Root (N-CHIUZHU-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-CHIUZHU-ABS-SG|N-CHIUZHU-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-CHIUZHU-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-AX-Root [<n>:] (N-AX-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-AX-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-AX-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-MOCI-Root [<n>:] (N-MOCI-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-MOCI-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-MOCI-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-TAMIXI-Root [<n>:] (N-TAMIXI-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-TAMIXI-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-TAMIXI-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-INZHIT-Root [<n>:] (N-INZHIT-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-INZHIT-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-INZHIT-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-FIZIKA-Root [<n>:] (N-FIZIKA-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-FIZIKA-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-FIZIKA-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-DARS-Root [<n>:] (N-DARS-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-DARS-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-DARS-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-RUQ-Root [<n>:] (N-RUQ-ABS-SG|N-RUQ-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-RUQ-OBL-SG CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-RUQ-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
N-XIZAN-Root [<n>:] (N-XIZAN-ABS CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-XIZAN-OBL CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-XIZAN-LOC LOC-CASES CLIT-SUBST-I?)
#N-AVTOR-Root [<n>:] (N-VAS-SG | N-JAS-SG) | (N-AVTOR-Infl (CLIT-SUBST-II) | (CLIT-SUBST-I) | (LOC-CASES))
#N-MUGHALIM-Root [<n>:] (N-VAS-SG | N-JAS-SG) | (N-MUGHALIM-Infl (CLIT-SUBST-II) | (CLIT-SUBST-I) | (LOC-CASES))
([майдан] (LEXICON N-STOL-ERG CLIT-SUBST-I?) | (N-STOL-ABS-SG|N-STOL-ABS-PL CLIT-SUBST-II?) | (N-STOL-OBL-SG|N-STOL-OBL-PL (N-VAS-CORE-CASES|LOC-CASES) CLIT-SUBST-I?)) | ([майдан<n><nt><pl><nom>:байдаби])

LEXICON LOC-CASES 

# 1 серия
<loc>:>да
<all>:>де
<abl>:>даса
<tra>:>дасан

# 2 серия
+хъ<post><loc>:>{u}хъ
+хъ<post><all>:>{u}хъе
+хъ<post><abl>:>{u}хъан
+хъ<post><tra>:>{u}хъан

# 3 серия
+лъ<post><loc>:>{u}лъ
+лъ<post><all>:>{u}лъе
+лъ<post><abl>:>{u}лъа
+лъ<post><tra>:>{u}лъан

# 4 серия
+кь<post><loc>:>{u}кь
+кь<post><all>:>{u}кье
+кь<post><abl>:>{u}кьа
+кь<post><tra>:>{u}кьан

# 5 серия
#<obl>+б<post><m><loc>:>{u}в
#<obl>+б<post><f><loc>:>{u}й
#<obl>+б<post><nt><loc>:>{u}б
#<obl>+б<post><pl><loc>:>{u}л
#<obl>+б<post><all>:>{u}е
#<obl>+б<post><abl>:>{u}са
#<obl>+б<post><tra>:>{u}сан

LEXICON CLIT-SUBST-I

+го<emph>:го  
+ги<cnjcoo>:ги 
+гин<adv>:гин 
+гун<adv>:гун
+ин<emph>:{й}ин

LEXICON CLIT-SUBST-II

+лъун<post>:лъун
+лъун<post>+ги<cnjcoo>:лъунги

LEXICON N-VAS-ABS-SG

<m><sg><nom>:

LEXICON N-VAS-ABS-PL

<m><pl><nom>:>{a}л

LEXICON N-VAS-OBL-SG

<m><sg><obl>:>{a}с

LEXICON N-VAS-OBL-PL
<m><pl><obl>:>{a}з

LEXICON N-VAS-CORE-CASES
<erg>: 
<gen>:ул  
<dat>:е

LEXICON N-MURSHID # как сингулярис N-VAS-SG

<m><pl><nom>:>заби   # Dir/LR
<m><pl><erg>:>забаз   # Dir/LR
<m><pl><gen>:>забазул   # Dir/LR
<m><pl><dat>:>забазе   # Dir/LR
<m><pl>:>забаз   # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-GIALIMCHI-ABS-PL # :чи N-VAS-SG

<m><pl><nom>:>заби 

LEXICON N-GIALIMCHI-OBL-PL 
<m><pl><obl>:>забаз  

LEXICON N-BIHINCHI-ABS-PL # :чи N-VAS-SG
<m><pl><nom>:>ал

LEXICON N-BIHINCHI-OBL-PL  
<m><pl><obl>:>з

LEXICON N-TURKAV

<m><sg><nom>:в  
<m><sg><erg>:>с  
<m><sg><gen>:>сул  
<m><sg><dat>:>се  
<m><sg>:>с  
<m><pl><nom>:>л  
<m><pl><erg>:>з  
<m><pl><gen>:>зул  
<m><pl><dat>:>зе  
<m><pl>:>з  

LEXICON N-TIEH

<nt><sg><nom>:ехь  
<nt><sg><erg>:ехь>алъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:ехь>алъул  
<nt><sg><dat>:ехь>алъе  
<nt><sg>:ехь>ал{ъ} 
<nt><pl><nom>:ахь>ал  
<nt><pl><erg>:ахь>аз  
<nt><pl><gen>:ахь>азул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ахь>азе  
<nt><pl>:ахь>аз  
<nt><sg><erg>:охь>оца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:охь>ол  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:охь>ое  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:охь>о  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:ухь>дул  # Dir/LR
#<n><nt><pl><erg>:охь>оз  # Dir/LR
#<n><nt><pl><gen>:охь>озул  # Dir/LR
#<n><nt><pl><dat>:охь>озе  # Dir/LR
#<n><nt><pl>:охь>оз  # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-CHIUZHUGIADAN

чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg><nom>:чӏужугӏадан  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg><erg>:чӏужугӏадам>{a}лъ  # Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg><gen>:чӏужугӏадам>{a}лъул  # Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg><dat>:чӏужугӏадам>{a}лъе  # Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg>:чӏужугӏадам>{a}л  # Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg><erg>:чӏужугӏадан>{a}лъ  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg><gen>:чӏужугӏадан>{a}лъул  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg><dat>:чӏужугӏадан>{a}лъе  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><sg>:чӏужугӏадан>{a}л  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><pl><nom>:руччаби  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><pl><erg>:руччабаз  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><pl><gen>:руччабаз>ул  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><pl><dat>:руччабаз>е  
чӏужугӏадан<n><f><pl>:руччабаз>  

LEXICON N-CHIUZHU-ABS-SG
чӏужу<n><f><sg><nom>:чӏужу

LEXICON N-CHIUZHU-ABS-PL
чӏужу<n><f><pl><nom>:руччаби

LEXICON N-CHIUZHU-OBL
чӏужу<n><f><sg><erg>:чӏужу>{a}лъ  
чӏужу<n><f><sg><gen>:чӏужу>{a}лъул  
чӏужу<n><f><sg><dat>:чӏужу>{a}лъе
чӏужу<n><f><pl><erg>:руччабаз  
чӏужу<n><f><pl><gen>:руччабаз>ул  
чӏужу<n><f><pl><dat>:руччабаз>е

LEXICON N-CHIUZHU-LOC
чӏужу<n><f><sg>:чӏужу>{a}л
чӏужу<n><f><pl>:руччабаз>

LEXICON N-JAS-ABS-SG
<f><sg><nom>: 

LEXICON N-JAS-OBL-SG
<f><sg><obl>:>{a}л{ъ}

LEXICON N-JAS-ABS-PL
<f><pl><nom>:>{a}л

LEXICON N-JAS-OBL-PL
<f><pl><obl>:>{a}з

LEXICON N-KIODO-ABS # плюралис как N-JAS-PL
<f><sg><nom>:

LEXICON N-KIODO-OBL
<f><sg><erg>:>ца 
<f><sg><gen>:>л 
<f><sg><dat>:>ле

LEXICON N-KIODO-LOC
<f><sg>:>л{ъ} 

LEXICON N-GEOGRAFIJA

<nt><sg>: 

<nt><pl><nom>:>л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>з  
<nt><pl><gen>:>зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>зе  
<nt><pl>:>з

LEXICON N-EKSPEDICIJA # сингулярис по типу N-GEOGRAFIJA

<nt><pl><nom>:>би   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><erg>:>баз   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><gen>:>базул   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><dat>:>базе   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl>:>баз   # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-CIAJI

<nt><sg><nom>:йи  
<nt><sg><erg>:йи>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:йи>ялъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:в>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:йи>ялъе  
<nt><sg>:йи>ял{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:йи>ял  
<nt><pl><erg>:йи>яз  
<nt><pl><gen>:йи>язул  
<nt><pl><dat>:йи>язе  
<nt><pl>:йи>яз  

LEXICON N-SPEKTAKL

<nt><sg><nom>:ь  
<nt><sg><erg>:>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ялъул  
<nt><sg><dat>:>ялъе  
<nt><sg>:>ял{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>ял  
<nt><pl><erg>:>яца  
<nt><pl><gen>:>язул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>язе  
<nt><pl>:>яз  

LEXICON N-BUSEN

<nt><sg><nom>:ен  
<nt><sg><erg>:ен>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:>аца   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:ен>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>адул   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ен>алъе  
#<n><nt><sg>:>ал{ъ}  
<nt><sg>:>а  
<nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
<nt><pl><erg>:>абаз  
<nt><pl><gen>:>абазул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>абазе  
<nt><pl>:>абаз  

LEXICON N-KALENDAR

<nt><sg><nom>:ь  
<nt><sg><erg>:>алъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>алъул  
<nt><sg><dat>:>алъе  
<nt><sg>:>ал{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>ал  
<nt><pl><erg>:>аца  
<nt><pl><gen>:>азул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>азе  
<nt><pl>:>аз  

LEXICON N-CHERX-ABS
<nt><sg><nom>:ерх
<nt><pl><nom>:урх>дул

LEXICON N-CHERX-OBL
<nt><sg><erg>:ерх>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:орх>оца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:ерх>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:орх>ол  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:орх>олъе  
<nt><pl><erg>:урх>дуз  
<nt><pl><gen>:урх>дузул  
<nt><pl><dat>:урх>дузе

LEXICON N-CHERX-LOC
<nt><sg>:ерх>ал{ъ}
<nt><pl>:урх>дуз    

LEXICON N-ROCEN

<nt><sg><nom>:ен  
<nt><sg><erg>:ен>алъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:ен>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:а>дул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ан>алъе  
<nt><sg>:ен>ал{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:ен>ал  
<nt><pl><erg>:ен>аз  
<nt><pl><gen>:ен>азул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ен>азе  
<nt><pl>:ен>аз  

LEXICON N-HVEL

<nt><sg><nom>:ел  
<nt><sg><erg>:ел>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:ал>ица  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:ел>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:ал>ил  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ал>алъе  
<nt><sg><dat>:ал>ие  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:ел>ал{ъ}  
<nt><sg>:ал>и  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:ел>ал  
<nt><pl><erg>:ел>аз  
<nt><pl><gen>:ел>азул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ел>азе  
<nt><pl>:ел>аз  

LEXICON N-KECH

<nt><sg><nom>:ечӏ  
<nt><sg><erg>:ечӏ>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:Ӏочӏ>оца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:ечӏ>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:очӏ>ол  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ечӏ>алъе  
<nt><sg>:ечӏ>ал{ъ}  
<nt><sg>:очӏ>ол  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:учӏ>дул  
<nt><pl><erg>:учӏ>дуз  
<nt><pl><gen>:учӏ>дузул  
<nt><pl><dat>:учӏ>дузе  
<nt><pl>:учӏ>дуз  

LEXICON N-KUCH
